Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.031

Health information technology office—Agencies to establish health care information systems.

The Washington state health information technology office is located within the authority. The following state agencies are directed to cooperate with the authority to establish appropriate health care information systems in their programs: The department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of labor and industries, the basic health plan, the department of veterans affairs, the department of corrections, the department of children, youth, and families, and the superintendent of public instruction.

The authority, in conjunction with these agencies and in collaboration with Washington technology solutions, shall determine:

(1) Definitions of health care services;

(2) Health care data elements common to all agencies;

(3) Health care data elements unique to each agency; and

(4) A mechanism for program and budget review of health care data.

[ 2024 c 54 s 34; 2023 c 51 s 7; 1990 c 222 s 4; 1988 c 107 s 5.]